Wisconsin, session 2025, AB921.
do enact as follows:AB921,11Section 1. 609.83 of the statutes is amended to read:AB921,2,42609.83 Coverage of drugs and devices. Limited service health 3organizations, preferred provider plans, and defined network plans are subject to 4ss. 632.853, 632.861, and 632.895 (6) (b), (16t), and (16v).AB921,25Section 2. 632.895 (6) (title) of the statutes is amended to read:AB921,2,76632.895 (6) (title) Equipment and supplies for treatment of diabetes; 7insulin.AB921,38Section 3. 632.895 (6) of the statutes is renumbered 632.895 (6) (a) and 9amended to read:AB921,2,2010632.895 (6) (a) Every disability insurance policy which that provides coverage 11of expenses incurred for treatment of diabetes shall provide coverage for expenses 12incurred by the installation and use of an insulin infusion pump, coverage for all 13other equipment and supplies, including insulin or any other prescription 14medication, used in the treatment of diabetes, and coverage of diabetic self-15management education programs. Coverage Except as provided in par. (b), 16coverage required under this subsection shall be subject to the same exclusions, 17limitations, deductibles, and coinsurance provisions of the policy as other covered 18expenses, except that insulin infusion pump coverage may be limited to the 19purchase of one pump per year and the insurer may require the insured to use a 20pump for 30 days before purchase.AB921,421Section 4. 632.895 (6) (b) of the statutes is created to read:AB921,2,2222632.895 (6) (b) 1. In this paragraph:AB921,3,21a. “Cost sharing” means the total of any deductible, copayment, or 2coinsurance amounts imposed on a person covered under a policy or plan.AB921,3,33b. “Self-insured health plan” has the meaning given in s. 632.85 (1) (c).AB921,3,642. Every disability insurance policy and self-insured health plan that covers 5insulin and imposes cost sharing on prescription drugs may not impose cost sharing 6on insulin in an amount that exceeds $35 for a one-month supply of insulin.AB921,3,1073. Nothing in this paragraph prohibits a disability insurance policy or self-8insured health plan from imposing cost sharing on insulin in an amount less than 9the amount specified under subd. 2. Nothing in this paragraph requires a disability 10insurance policy or self-insured health plan to impose any cost sharing on insulin.AB921,511Section 5. Effective date.AB921,3,1312(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 4th month beginning after 13publication.AB921,3,1414